Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB139.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 40 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Accessibility ramp" means a modular or custom-built ramp, including
appurtenant parts thereto such as landings and railings, all of which are:
1. Constructed in accordance with and otherwise comply with all
pertinent parts of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, 42
U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq.; the Kentucky Residential Building Code
adopted under KRS Chapter 198B; any local government ordinances;
and any homeowners association covenants; and
2. Constructed and installed by a contractor or other person registered
with the Kentucky Secretary of State and whose business would
encompass the construction and installation of accessibility ramps;
(b) "Disabled veteran" means an individual, domiciled in Kentucky, who has
served in the Armed Forces, has been separated therefrom under honorable
or general conditions, and has established the present existence of a service-
connected disability or is receiving compensation, disability retirements
benefits, or pension because of a public statute administered by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or Department of Defense, or was
separated by the Department of Defense because of a disability;
(c) "Immediate family member" means a disabled veteran's father, mother,
brother, sister, spouse, son, daughter, stepson, stepdaughter, grandchild,
aunt, uncle, son-in-law, or daughter-in-law; and
(d) "Residence" means a single-family home owned by a disabled veteran or an
immediate family member of a disabled veteran which is the principal place
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2026 9:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1988
of residence of the disabled veteran.
(2) There is established in the Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs the
Residential Ease of Access for Disabled Veterans Program for the purpose of
funding the construction and installation of accessibility ramps on residences of
disabled veterans.
(3) In developing an application procedure, the Kentucky Department of Veterans'
Affairs shall require persons applying to the program for the construction and
installation of an accessibility ramp for a disabled veteran to first contact the
nearest veterans' service organization which shall then transmit applications to
the department.
(4) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the Residential Ease of Access for Disabled Veterans Program grant
fund, which shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts,
grants, and federal funds.
(5) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(6) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(8) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs may promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2026 9:27 AM Jacketed